Virginia statutes. Title 57. Religious and Charitable Matters; Cemeteries.
Chapter 5. Solicitation of Contributions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 78; 13A M.J. Mobs, Riots and Lynchings, § 1.

§ 57-48.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
means the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

“Charitable organization”
means any person that is or holds itself out to be organized or operated for any charitable purpose, or any person that solicits or obtains contributions solicited from the public. “Charitable organization” does not include (i) any church or convention or association of churches, primarily operated for nonsecular purposes and no part of the net income of which inures to the direct benefit of any individual; (ii) any political party as defined in §

24.2-101

or any political campaign committee or political action committee or other political committee required by state or federal law to file a report or statement of contributions and expenditures; or (iii) any authorized individual who solicits, by authority of such organization, solely on behalf of a registered or exempt charitable organization or on behalf of an organization excluded from the definition of charitable organization.

“Charitable purpose”
means any charitable, benevolent, humane, philanthropic, patriotic, or eleemosynary purpose and the purposes of influencing legislation or influencing the actions of any public official or instigating, prosecuting, or intervening in litigation.

“Charitable sales promotion”
means advertised sales that feature the names of both the commercial co-venturer and the charitable or civic organization and that state that the purchase or use of the goods, services, entertainment, or any other thing of value that the commercial co-venturer normally sells will benefit the charitable or civic organization or its purposes. To qualify as a charitable sales promotion, the consumer must pay the same price for the thing of value as the commercial co-venturer usually charges without the charitable sales promotion and the consumer retains the thing of value.

“Civic organization”
means any local service club, veterans post, fraternal society or association, volunteer fire or rescue group, or local civic league or association of 10 or more persons not organized for profit but operated exclusively for educational or charitable purposes as defined in this section, including the promotion of community welfare, and the net earnings of which are devoted exclusively to charitable, educational, recreational, or social welfare purposes.

“Commercial co-venturer”
means any person who (i) is organized for profit, (ii) is regularly and primarily engaged in trade or commerce, other than in connection with soliciting for charitable or civic organizations or charitable purposes, and (iii) conducts an advertised charitable sales promotion for a specified limited period of time.

“Commissioner”
means the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services or a member of his staff to whom he may delegate his duties under this chapter.

“Contribution”
means any gift, bequest, devise, or other grant of any money, credit, financial assistance, or property of any kind or value, including the promise to contribute, except payments by the membership of an organization for membership fees, dues, fines, or assessments, or for services rendered to individual members, and except money, credit, financial assistance, or property received from any governmental authority. “Contribution” does not include any donation of blood or any gift made pursuant to Article 2 (§

32.1-291.1

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 32.1.

“Department”
means the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

“Federated fund-raising organization”
means any federation of independent charitable organizations that have voluntarily joined together, including but not limited to a United Fund or Community Chest, for purposes of raising and distributing money for and among themselves and where membership does not confer operating authority and control of the individual agencies upon the federated group organization.

“File with the Commissioner”
means depositing the originals of the documents required to be filed, along with the payment of the appropriate fee and all supporting documents with the Department or submitting the required documents and any appropriate attachments and fees by utilizing an online filing system approved by the Commissioner.

“Fund-raising expenses”
means the expenses of all activities that constitute or are an integral and inseparable part of a solicitation.

“Membership”
means those persons to whom, for payment of fees, dues, assessments, etc., an organization provides services and confers a bona fide right, privilege, professional standing, honor, or other direct benefit, in addition to the right to vote, elect officers, or hold offices. “Membership” does not include those persons who are granted a membership upon making a contribution as the result of solicitation.

“Parent organization”
means that part of a charitable organization that coordinates, supervises, or exercises control over policy, fund raising, and expenditures or assists or advises one or more chapters, branches, or affiliates.

“Person”
means any individual, organization, trust, foundation, association, partnership, corporation, society, or other group or combination acting as a unit.

“Professional fund-raising counsel”
means any person who for a flat fixed fee under a written agreement plans, conducts, manages, carries on, advises, or acts as a consultant, whether directly or indirectly, in connection with soliciting contributions for, or on behalf of, any charitable or civic organization, but who actually solicits no contributions as a part of such services. A bona fide salaried officer or employee of a registered or exempt charitable organization or the bona fide salaried officer or employee of a registered parent organization shall not be deemed to be a professional fund-raising counsel.

“Professional solicitor”
means any person who, for a financial or other consideration, solicits contributions for, or on behalf of, a charitable or civic organization, whether such solicitation is performed personally or through his agents, servants, or employees or through agents, servants, or employees who are specially employed by or for a charitable or civic organization and are engaged in the solicitation of contributions under the direction of such person or any person who, for a financial or other consideration, plans, conducts, manages, carries on, advises, or acts as a consultant to a charitable or civic organization in connection with the solicitation of contributions but does not qualify as a professional fund-raising counsel. A bona fide salaried officer or employee of a registered or exempt charitable organization or a bona fide salaried officer or employee of a registered parent organization shall not be deemed to be a professional solicitor.

“Sale,” “sell,”
and

“sold”

mean the transfer of any property or the rendition of any service to any person in exchange for consideration, including any purported contribution without which such property would not have been transferred or such services would not have been rendered.

“Solicit”
and

“solicitation”

mean the request or appeal, directly or indirectly, for any contribution on the plea or representation that such contribution will be used for a charitable purpose, including, without limitation, the following methods of requesting such contribution:

Any oral or written request;

Any announcement to the press, over the radio or television, or by telephone or telegraph concerning an appeal or campaign to which the public is requested to make a contribution for any charitable purpose connected therewith;

The distribution, circulation, posting, or publishing of any handbill, written advertisement, or other publication that directly or by implication seeks to obtain public support; or

The sale of, offer, or attempt to sell, any advertisement, advertising space, subscription, ticket, or any service or tangible item in connection with which any appeal is made for any charitable purpose or where the name of any charitable or civic organization is used or referred to in any such appeal as an inducement or reason for making any such sale, or when or where in connection with any such sale, any statement is made that the whole or any part of the proceeds from any such sale will be donated to any charitable purpose.“Solicitation,” as defined in this section, shall be deemed to occur when the request is made, at the place the request is received, whether or not the person making the same actually receives any contribution.“Terrorists and terrorist organizations” means any person, organization, group, or conspiracy who assists or has assisted terrorist organizations, as provided in 18 U.S.C. § 2339B, or who commits or attempts to commit acts of terrorism, as defined in §

18.2-46.4

.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, cc. 124, 595, 598; 1983, c. 374; 1984, c. 268; 1988, c. 322; 1990, c. 711; 1996, c. 461; 2003, cc. 576, 977, 1009; 2005, c. 329; 2007, cc. 92, 907; 2013, c. 24; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 465.

The numbers of §§

57-48

through

57-68

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 1974 act having been 57-40.1 through 57-40.22.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 92 and 907, cl. 3, provide: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 1996 amendment,

effective March 31, 1996, in the paragraph defining “Charitable organization,” deleted former clause (iii) which read: “any labor union registered under §

40.1-76

nor any trade association” and redesignated former clause (iv) as present clause (iii).

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 576 inserted “or political action committee or other political committee” in clause (ii) of the definition of ‘charitable organization’; substituted “10” for “ten” in the definition of ‘civic organization’; and added definitions of ‘charitable sales promotion’ and ‘commercial co-venturer.’

The 2003 amendments by cc. 977 and 1009 are identical, and substituted “10” for “ten” in the definition of ‘civic organization’; and inserted the definition of ‘terrorists and terrorist organizations.’

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 329 added the definition of “File with the Commissioner.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 92 and 907 are identical, and substituted “(§

32.1-289.2

et seq.)” for “(§

32.1-289

et seq.)” in the last sentence in the definition of “Contribution.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 24, in the paragraph defining “Charitable organization,” substituted “‘Charitable organization’ does not include” for “This definition shall not be deemed to include” in the second sentence; in the paragraph defining “Contribution,” substituted “‘Contribution’ does not include” for “The term ‘Contribution’ shall not include” in the last sentence; added the paragraph defining “Department”; in the paragraph defining “File with the Commissioner,” substituted “Department” for “Office of Consumer Affairs,”; in the paragraph defining “Membership,”’ substituted “ ‘Membership’ ” does not include” for “The term ‘membership’ shall not include”; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 465, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “§

32.1-291.1

” for “§

32.1-289.2

” in the definition for “Contribution.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 57-49.
Registration of charitable organizations; prohibition against support of terrorists.

Every charitable organization, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, which intends to solicit contributions within the Commonwealth, or have funds solicited on its behalf, shall, prior to any solicitation, file an initial registration statement with the Commissioner upon forms acceptable to him. Each registration statement shall thereafter be refiled on or before the fifteenth day of the fifth calendar month of the next and each following fiscal year in which such charitable organization is engaged in solicitation activities within the Commonwealth. It shall be the duty of the president, chairman or principal officer of such charitable organization to file the statements required under this chapter. A charitable organization’s registration statement may alternatively be filed online on a website approved by the Commissioner. Such statement shall contain the following information:

The name of the organization and the purpose for which it was organized.

The principal address of the organization, the address of any offices in the Commonwealth and its designated agent for process within the Commonwealth. If no such agent is designated, the organization shall be deemed to have designated the Secretary of the Commonwealth. If the organization does not maintain an office, the name and address of the person having custody of its financial records.

The names and addresses of any chapters, branches or affiliates in the Commonwealth.

The place where and the date when the organization was legally established, the form of its organization, and a reference to any determination of its tax-exempt status under the Internal Revenue Code.

The names and addresses of the officers, directors, trustees and the principal salaried executive staff officer.

A copy of a balance sheet and income and expense statement, with the opinion of any independent public accountant, for the organization’s immediately preceding fiscal year; a copy of a financial statement certified by an independent public accountant covering, in a consolidated report, complete information as to all the preceding year’s fund-raising activities of the charitable organization, showing kind and amount of funds raised, fund-raising expenses and allocation of disbursement of funds raised; or a copy of Internal Revenue Service Form 990. The report required by this subdivision shall comply with the accounting standards prescribed pursuant to §

57-53

. Any organization whose annual gross revenue qualifies such organization to file Form 990-N (also referred to as the e-Postcard) with the Internal Revenue Service may submit a balance sheet and income and expense statement verified under oath or affirmation by the treasurer of the organization.

A statement indicating the amount of funds expended during the preceding fiscal year to pay for the administrative expenses of the charitable organization and a computation of such expenses as a percentage of the total expenses of the charitable organization.

A statement indicating the amount of funds expended during the preceding fiscal year that was dedicated to providing charitable services and a computation of such expenses as a percentage of the total expenses of the charitable organization.

A statement showing the computation of the percentages provided for in §

57-58

.

A statement indicating whether the organization intends to solicit contributions from the public directly or have such done on its behalf by others.

A statement indicating whether the organization is authorized by any other governmental authority to solicit contributions and whether it, or any officer, professional fund-raiser or professional solicitor thereof, is or has ever been enjoined by any court or otherwise prohibited from soliciting contributions in any jurisdiction.

The general purpose or purposes for which the contributions to be solicited shall be used.

The name or names under which it intends to solicit contributions.

The names of the individuals or officers of the organization who will have final responsibility for the custody of the contributions.

The names of the individuals or officers of the organization responsible for the final distribution of the contributions.

A statement indicating whether the organization, or any officer, professional fund-raiser or professional solicitor thereof, has ever been convicted of a felony and, if so, a description of the pertinent facts.

A copy of the current articles of incorporation, bylaws, or other governing documents. If current copies are already on file with the Commissioner, only amendments, if any, shall be filed in years after the initial registration.

A description of the types of solicitation to be undertaken.

Each chapter, branch or affiliate, except an independent member agency of a federated fund-raising organization, shall separately report the information required by this section or report the information to its parent organization which shall then furnish such information as to itself and all of its state affiliates, chapters and branches in a consolidated form. All affiliated organizations included in a consolidated registration statement shall be considered as one charitable organization for all purposes of this chapter. If a consolidated registration statement is filed, all statements thereafter filed shall be upon the same basis unless permission to change is granted by the Commissioner.

Each federated fund-raising organization shall report the information required by this section in a consolidated form. Any federated fund-raising organization may elect to exclude from its consolidated report information relating to the separate fund-raising activities of all of its independent member agencies. No member agency of a federated fund-raising organization shall be required to report separately any information contained in such a consolidated report. Any separate solicitations campaign conducted by, or on behalf of, any such member agency shall nevertheless be subject to all other provisions of this chapter.

The registration forms shall be signed by the chief fiscal officer and by another authorized officer of the charitable organization. If the registration forms are filed online using a website approved by the Commissioner, the charitable organization shall follow the procedures on that website for signing the forms.

Every charitable organization which submits an independent registration to the Commissioner shall pay an annual registration fee of (i) $30 if its gross contributions for the preceding year do not exceed $25,000; (ii) $50 if its gross contributions exceed $25,000 but do not exceed $50,000; (iii) $100 if its gross contributions exceed $50,000 but do not exceed $100,000; (iv) $200 if its gross contributions exceed $100,000 but do not exceed $500,000; (v) $250 if its gross contributions exceed $500,000 but do not exceed $1 million; and (vi) $325 if its gross contributions exceed $1 million. A parent organization filing on behalf of one or more chapters, branches or affiliates or a federated fund-raising organization filing on behalf of its member agencies shall pay a single annual registration fee for itself and such chapters, branches, affiliates or member agencies included in the registration statement. Organizations with no prior financial history filing an initial registration shall be required to pay an initial fee of $100. Organizations with prior financial history filing an initial registration shall be required to pay an initial fee of $100 in addition to the annual registration fee. Any organization which allows its registration to lapse, without requesting an extension of time to file, shall be required to resubmit an initial registration. An extension may be granted upon receipt of a written request.

A1.

Every registration statement shall include the following language:“No funds have been or will knowingly be used, directly or indirectly, to benefit or provide support, in cash or in kind, to terrorists, terrorist organizations, terrorist activities, or the family members of any terrorist.”

A2.

No person shall be registered by the Commonwealth or by any locality to solicit funds that are intended to benefit or support terrorists, terrorist organizations or terrorist activities. No person shall be registered by the Commonwealth or by any locality to solicit funds that are intended to benefit or support a family member of any terrorist, unless a court of competent jurisdiction within the Commonwealth, upon petition of an interested person, finds by clear and convincing evidence that, for a period of at least three years next preceding any act of terrorism committed by such terrorist or terrorist organization, the family members to whom the benefit of the contributions shall inure have been living separate and apart from the terrorist or terrorist organization, and the family members have not provided any financial support, in cash or in kind, to the terrorist or terrorist organization for the same period of time.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1975, c. 221; 1979, c. 595; 1984, c. 268; 1986, c. 31; 1987, c. 561; 1988, c. 322; 1990, c. 711; 1993, cc. 577, 583; 1995, cc. 170, 205; 2003, cc. 576, 977, 1009; 2005, c. 329; 2012, c. 313; 2017, c. 763; 2018, c. 268.

Cross references.

As to requirement regarding disclosure of financial statements, see §

57-55.3

.

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendment by c. 170, effective March 14, 1995, substituted “within” for “with” in the first sentence of subdivision A 2 and substituted “or a copy” for “and a copy” at the end of the first sentence of subdivision A 6.

The 1995 amendment by c. 205, effective March 14, 1995, substituted “or a copy of Internal Revenue Service Form 990” for “and a copy of Internal Revenue Service Form 990” near the middle of subdivision A 6.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 576 substituted “the” for “this” preceding “Commonwealth” in the first sentence of subsection A; and substituted “signed” for “verified under oath or affirmation” in subsection D.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 977 and 1009 are identical, and added subsections A1 and A2.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by c. 329 inserted the next-to-last sentence in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; added the last sentence in subsection D; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 313 substituted “whose annual gross revenue qualifies such organization to file Form 990-N (also referred to as the e-Postcard) with the Internal Revenue Service” for “with gross revenue of less than $25,000” in the last sentence of subdivision A 6.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 763 inserted subdivision A 7, and redesignated remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 268 added subdivision A 7, and renumbered the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and rewrote subdivision A 8, which formerly read “A statement indicating the percentage of contributions received during the preceding fiscal year that was dedicated to the charitable purpose of the charitable organization.”

Law Review.

For article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2018).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Charitable organization that allows its registration to lapse,

without requesting an extension of time to file, must resubmit an initial registration and pay the initial fee of $100 and the required annual registration fee. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert G. Marshall, Member, House of Delegates, 04-076, 2004 Va. AG LEXIS 70 (11/12/04).

§ 57-50.
Reciprocal agreements with other states; online filing.

The Commissioner may enter into a reciprocal agreement with the appropriate authority of any other state for the purpose of exchanging information with respect to charitable organizations, professional fund-raising counsel and professional solicitors. Pursuant to such agreements, the Commissioner may accept information filed by a charitable organization, professional fund-raising counsel and professional solicitor with the appropriate authority of another state in lieu of the information required to be filed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, if such information is substantially similar to the information required under this chapter. The Commissioner may also grant exemption from the requirement for the filing of [an] annual registration statement with him to charitable organizations organized under the laws of another state, having their principal place of business in such other state, having funds derived principally from sources outside the Commonwealth, and having been granted exemption from the filing of registration statements by such other state, if such state has a statute similar in substance to the provisions of this chapter and participates in a reciprocal agreement pursuant to this section.

The Commissioner may also enter into a memorandum of understanding or other similar agreement with the appropriate authority of any other state or federal agency for the purpose of providing charitable organizations, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitors with the option of filing their annual registration statements online on a website approved by all states that are parties to the memorandum of understanding. The Commissioner may accept such online filing in lieu of the information required to be filed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter if the procedures for online filing provide for submitting substantially similar information to that required by this chapter. The information provided by charitable organizations, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitors at the approved website as a result of their completion of the online registration statement shall be shared with the appropriate authority of any state or federal agency that is a party to the memorandum of understanding.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595; 2005, c. 329.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 329 inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph; added subsection B; and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 57-51.
Nonresident registration.

Any unregistered charitable organization, professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor, having his or its principal place of business without this Commonwealth or organized under and by virtue of the laws of a foreign state who or which shall solicit contributions from people in this Commonwealth, shall be deemed to have irrevocably appointed the Secretary of the Commonwealth as his or its agent upon whom may be served any summons, subpoena, subpoena duces tecum or other process directed to such charitable organization, or any partner, principal, officer, or director thereof or to such professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor. Service shall be made by leaving two copies of the process, notice, order or demand, together with any fee required by law, in the office of the Secretary of the Commonwealth, together with an affidavit giving the last known post-office address of the defendant and such service shall be sufficient if notice of such service and a copy of the process, notice, order or demand are forthwith sent by registered mail, with return receipt requested, by the Secretary of the Commonwealth or one of his staff to the defendant at the specified address. An affidavit by the Secretary of the Commonwealth showing compliance herewith shall be filed with the papers in the suit, action or proceeding.

Any charitable organization, having no office or place of business within this Commonwealth and soliciting in this Commonwealth from without the Commonwealth solely by telephone or telegraph, direct mail or advertising in national media, and any professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitor engaged by such an organization, shall file with the Commissioner any report which would otherwise be required of it or request the Commissioner to determine that such organization is exempt under §

57-50

or §

57-60

.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595; 1984, c. 268.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 2-104.1 Affidavit for Service of Process on Secretary of the Commonwealth — District Court; No. 5-701 Affidavit for Service of Process on the Secretary of the Commonwealth; No. 5-802 Affidavit for Service of Process on the Secretary of the Commonwealth.

§ 57-52.
Publication of warnings concerning certain charitable and civic organizations.

If the Commissioner determines that any charitable or civic organization not registered with his office and not exempt from registration, irrespective of whether such organization is subject to the jurisdiction of this Commonwealth, has solicited or may be soliciting in this Commonwealth, directly or indirectly, by any means including without limitation, by telephone or telegraph, by direct mail or by advertising in national media, he may, after ten days’ written notice mailed to the charitable or civic organization, cause to be printed in one or more newspapers published in this Commonwealth a notice in substantially the following form:

WARNING—UNREGISTERED CHARITABLE SOLICITATION

The organization named below has solicited contributions from Virginia citizens for allegedly charitable purposes. It has not registered with or been granted the appropriate exempt status by the Commissioner as required by law. Contributors are cautioned that their contributions to such organization may be used for noncharitable purposes.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595; 1983, c. 374; 1988, c. 322.

§ 57-52.1.
Publication of warnings concerning solicitation by professional solicitors.

If the Commissioner determines that any charitable or civic organization has contracted with a professional solicitor to solicit on its behalf and that the professional solicitor may be soliciting or has solicited in this Commonwealth, directly or indirectly, by any means including, without limitation, by telephone or telegraph, by direct mail or by advertising in national media, and the professional solicitor has not registered with the Commissioner as required by §

57-61

, the Commissioner may, after five days’ written notice mailed to the charitable or civic organization, cause to be printed in one or more newspapers published in this Commonwealth a notice on substantially the following form:

WARNING—UNREGISTERED CHARITABLE SOLICITATION BY PROFESSIONAL SOLICITOR

The charitable or civic organization named below has contracted with a professional solicitor to solicit on its behalf. The professional solicitor has not registered with the Commonwealth of Virginia as required by law. Contributors are cautioned that their contributions may be used for noncharitable purposes.

History.

1987, c. 561.

§ 57-53.
Records to be kept by charitable organizations.

Every charitable organization shall keep true fiscal records for all fiscal years beginning on and after January 1, 1975, in accordance with the standards and practices set out in Standards of Accounting and Financial Reporting for Voluntary Health and Welfare Organizations adopted and approved in December, 1964, by the National Health Council and National Social Welfare Assembly, and as may be modified from time to time by the National Health Council and the National Assembly for Policy and Development, or in accordance with the standards and practices set out in Uniform Chart of Accounts and Definitions for Hospitals as approved by, and as may be modified by, the American Hospital Association, or in accordance with such other uniform standards of accounting as the Commissioner may find to be as appropriate. A copy of such standards shall be maintained on file in the office of the Commissioner. Such records shall be retained for a period of at least three years after the end of the period of registration to which they relate.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595.

§ 57-54.
Contracts between charitable or civic organizations and professional fund-raising counsel or professional solicitors.

Every contract or agreement between professional fund-raising counsel and a charitable or civic organization must be in writing and shall be filed with the Commissioner within ten days after such contract or written agreement is entered into.

Every contract, or a written statement of the nature of the arrangement to prevail in the absence of a contract, between a professional solicitor and a charitable or civic organization shall be filed with the Commissioner at least ten days prior to commencement of the contract.

All agreements and arrangements between professional fund-raising counsel and charitable or civic organizations must be reduced to writing before executed or acted upon.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595; 1983, c. 374; 1988, c. 322.

§ 57-55.
Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 445.

§ 57-55.1.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 711.

Cross references.

As to present provisions relating to disclosure requirements for charitable organizations regarding financial statements, see §

57-55.3

.

§ 57-55.2.
Charitable solicitation disclosure.

Every professional solicitor who solicits contributions from a prospective contributor in the Commonwealth: (i) shall identify himself and his employer; (ii) shall disclose that he is a paid solicitor; and (iii) shall further disclose, in writing, the fact that a financial statement for the last fiscal year is available from the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

1987, c. 561; 2013, c. 24.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 24 substituted “Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services” for “State Office of Consumer Affairs.”

§ 57-55.2:1.
Solicitations by for-profit organizations.

Every solicitor for an organization which is for-profit which solicits contributions from a prospective contributor in the Commonwealth shall disclose that the organization is not exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

For every contribution received for five dollars or more, a for-profit organization shall, within thirty days following receipt, send a written statement to such contributor disclosing that the organization is not exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

History.

1993, c. 240.

§ 57-55.3.
Disclosure regarding financial statement required.

Every charitable organization required to be registered pursuant to §

57-49

and every professional solicitor required to be registered pursuant to §

57-61

soliciting contributions from prospective contributors shall disclose to the potential donor contemporaneously at the point of a written request or on a written receipt for donations made in response to an oral request that a financial statement is available from the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services upon request.

History.

1990, c. 930; 2003, c. 576; 2013, c. 24.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 576 substituted “State Office of Consumer Affairs” for “State Division of Consumer Affairs.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 24 deleted “the State Office of Consumer Affairs” preceding “the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services” and made minor punctuation changes.

§ 57-55.4.
Collection receptacles; required disclosures.

No (i) business as defined in §

58.1-3700.1

, other than a charitable or civic organization to which contributions are deductible under § 170 of the Internal Revenue Code, or (ii) professional solicitor shall place or maintain a receptacle in public view for the purpose of collecting donated clothing, household items, or other items for future resale unless such person or professional solicitor places on the receptacle a permanent sign or label in a prominent place that includes the following information printed in letters that are no less than three inches in height and no less than one-half inch in width and in a color that contrasts with the color of the receptacle, which sign or label shall be placed immediately below the opening in the receptacle used to deposit donations:

The name, business address, and telephone number of the person engaged in such business or the professional solicitor; and

For a receptacle placed or maintained by a person engaged in such business, a statement that reads: “This donation receptacle is operated by a for-profit business. Items donated here support a for-profit business.”; or

For a receptacle placed or maintained by the professional solicitor, a statement that reads: “This donation receptacle is operated by a professional solicitor. Items donated here support, in part, the professional solicitor, which is a for-profit entity.”Enforcement of a violation of this section shall be limited to subsections B through E of §

57-59

.

History.

2015, c. 476.

Editor’s note.

For § 170 of the Internal Revenue Code, referred to above, see 26 U.S.C.S. § 170.

§ 57-56.
Information filed to become public records.

Registration statements, reports, professional fund-raising counsel contracts or professional solicitor contracts and all other documents and information required to be filed under this chapter shall become public records in the office of the Commissioner, and shall be open to the general public for inspection at such time and under such conditions as the Commissioner may prescribe. A charge not exceeding one dollar per page may be made for any copy of such documents and information as may be furnished any person by the Commissioner.

History.

1974, c. 574; 1979, c. 595.